aghul_numerals.twol
Alphabet
  а б в г д е ё ж з и й к л м н о п р с т у ф х ц ч Ӏ ш щ ъ ы ь э ю я
  %{Д%}:д %{Д%}:й %{Д%}:0 %{X%}:0;
Rules
"д переходит в й перед падежными окончаниями единственного числа"
%{Д%}:й <=> _ и ;

"конечный д в числительных наречиях"
%{Д%}:0 <=> _ %{X%}:0 ;
